Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 62.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 62.3. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall promulgate rules for use by state agencies
and the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to dispose of
surplus property. The rules shall include standards for
recordkeeping, methods for removal or disposal of surplus property,
and acquisition by state agencies and authorized entities of surplus
property, and for Office management of surplus property programs.
B. A state agency selling, trading, redistributing or otherwise
disposing of surplus property shall comply with the rules
promulgated by the Director.

C. The Office shall make surplus property available to state
agencies and authorized entities, which shall include political
subdivisions, school districts, and nonprofit entities of this
state.
D. The provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus Property Act shall
not apply to institutions of higher education in this state, the
Oklahoma Historical Society, the University Hospitals Authority or
University Hospitals Trust or the Northeast Oklahoma Public
Facilities Authority. The Grand River Dam Authority shall be exempt
from the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus Property Act for any
surplus property disposed of prior to November 1, 2006. CompSource
Oklahoma shall be exempt from the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus
Property Act if CompSource Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot
program authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of this title.
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus
Property Act, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation may,
pursuant to rules promulgated by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation Commission for that purpose, donate any surplus
property, as defined in Section 62.2 of this title, to any law
enforcement agency of any political subdivision of the State of
Oklahoma. The use of such donated equipment shall be limited to
valid and authorized law enforcement efforts by the receiving
agency.
F. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus
Property Act, the Oklahoma Highway Patrol may, pursuant to rules
promulgated by the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, donate surplus Oklahoma Highway Patrol vehicles
driven over ninety thousand (90,000) miles to any law enforcement
agency of any political subdivision of the State of Oklahoma in a
county with a population of no more than one hundred thousand
(100,000) residents. The use of such donated vehicles shall be
limited to valid and authorized law enforcement efforts by the
receiving agency.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2724 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2724 Page 3